test/src/dict-gt-yamls/A-luae3h3h3h_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Adjective - luäǯ'ǯ class A1a: # Adjective 'loose' - full paradigm
    luäǯǯ+A+Sg+Nom: luäǯ'ǯ
    luäǯǯ+A+Pl+Nom: luäǯǯ
    luäǯǯ+A+Attr: luäǯǯas
    luäǯǯ+A+Comp+Attr: luäǯǯab
    luäǯǯ+A+Superl+Attr: luäǯǯmõs
